District of Columbia statutes.
47-1818.06

Tax credits to Qualified Social E-Commerce Companies; exceptions.

A Qualified Social E-Commerce company that utilizes, or is the beneficiary of, any of the following tax abatements, exemptions, or waivers during the abatement period shall not be eligible for the abatements pursuant to § 47-1818.02, and further, the utilization of, or being the beneficiary of, the abatements provided for in § 47-1818.02 shall disqualify a Qualified Social E-Commerce Company from eligibility for any of the following tax abatements, exemptions, or waivers:

(1)

The real property tax abatement for certain commercial properties provided in § 47-811.03.

(2)

Earning and allowance of wage tax credits against the tax imposed by § 47-1817.06, as provided in § 47-1817.03, during calendar years 2010 through 2015, unless the amount of such credits earned exceeds $15 million, in which case the credit amount in excess of $15 million may be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed by § 47-1817.06, as provided in § 47-1817.03.

(3)

The waiver of corporate income tax on a Qualified High Technology Company for 5 years from the date of commencing business as provided in § 47-1817.06(a)(2)(C).

Oct. 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-174, § 2, 59 DCR 8712

History